Hawaii statutes.
§431:10-104 General readability
requirements. In addition to any other requirements of law, no contract
shall be delivered or issued for delivery in this State unless:

(1) The text is in plain language, achieving a
minimum score of forty on the Flesch reading ease test or an equivalent score
on any other comparable test prescribed by the commissioner under section
431:10-105(a);

(2) The contract is printed, except for specification
pages, schedules, and tables, in not less than ten point type, one point
leaded;

(3) The style, arrangement, and general appearance of
the contract give no undue prominence to any endorsements, riders, or other
portions of the text;

(4) A table of contents or index of principal
sections is provided with the contract when the text consists of more than
three thousand words printed on three or less pages or when the text has more
than three pages regardless of the total number of printed words; and

(5) For any short-term health insurance policies that
impose preexisting conditions provisions, any policy, application, or sales
brochure shall disclose in a conspicuous manner in not less than fourteen point
bold face type the following statement:

"THIS POLICY EXCLUDES COVERAGE FOR
CONDITIONS FOR WHICH MEDICAL ADVICE, DIAGNOSIS, CARE, OR TREATMENT WAS
RECOMMENDED OR RECEIVED DURING THE [insert exclusion period] IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF COVERAGE."

[L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2016, c 141, §5]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next